Louisiana, session 2026, HB998.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:622(A)(introductory paragraph), (2), and (3) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 15:622(A)(6) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§622. Sexual assault collection kits; forensic medical examinations
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(2)(a) "Forensic medical examination" means an examination, provided to
the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense by a health care provider for the
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
purpose of gathering and preserving evidence of a sexual assault for use in a court
of law. whether or not for the purpose of developing or preserving a sexual assault
collection kit, that is conducted by a healthcare provider for the purpose of gathering
and preserving evidence of a sexual assault or domestic violence, including
strangulation, for use in a court of law and is provided to any of the following:
(i) A victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense.
(ii) A victim of domestic violence, including strangulation.
(b) A forensic medical examination shall include the following:
(a) (i) Examination of physical trauma.
(b) (ii) Patient interview, including all of the following:
(aa) Any history of violence or abuse.
(bb) Current and prior strangulation history.
(cc) An assessment and documentation of any current and prior symptoms
and injuries.
(dd) Any other relevant medical history, triage, and consultation.
(ee) Triage.
(ff) Consultation.
(c) (iii) Collection and evaluation of evidence, including but not limited to
the following:
(aa) Physical evidence.
(i) (bb) Photographic documentation.
(cc) Medical and forensic specimens, including toxicology screening for
alcohol and drug-facilitated sexual assaults or domestic violence.
(ii) (dd) Preservation and maintenance of chain of custody.
(iii) Medical specimen collection.
(iv) When determined necessary by the healthcare provider, an alcohol- and
drug-facilitated sexual assault assessment and toxicology screening.
(iv) Any testing recommended by the healthcare provider or related to the
sexual assault or domestic violence offense, including strangulation.
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
(v) Any medication provided during the forensic medical examination which
may include emergency contraception and prophylaxis for HIV or a sexually
transmitted infection.
(3) "Sexual assault collection kit" means a human biological specimen or
specimens collected by a health care healthcare provider during a forensic medical
examination from the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense.
* * *
(6) "Domestic violence" means but is not limited to acts that constitute any
of the following:
(a) Battery of a dating partner (R.S. 14:34.9).
(b) Aggravated assault upon a dating partner (R.S. 14:34.9.1).
(c) Domestic abuse battery (R.S. 14:35.3).
(d) Domestic abuse aggravated assault (R.S. 14:37.7).
(e) Dating violence as provided in R.S. 46:2151.
* * *
Section 2. The heading of Part III-A of Subchapter D of Chapter 5-D of Title 40 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, R.S. 40:1216.1(A)(introductory paragraph), (1)(b),
(2)(introductory paragraph), (b), (c) through (e), (5)(introductory paragraph), (6), and (7),
and (G)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1216.1(A)(5)(c) and (H)(8) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III-A. HEALTHCARE SERVICES FOR VICTIMS OF
SEXUALLY ORIENTED CRIMINAL OFFENSES OR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE,
INCLUDING STRANGULATION
§1216.1. Procedures for survivors of a sexually oriented criminal offense or
domestic violence, including strangulation; immunity; regional plans;
maximum allowable costs; definitions; documents requested by victim
A. All licensed hospitals and healthcare providers in Louisiana this state
shall offer information to every survivor of sexual assault survivor and every
survivor of domestic violence, including strangulation, information to receive the
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
treatment provided for in this Section. A licensed hospital or healthcare provider
shall adhere to the following procedures if a person presents for treatment as a
survivor of sexual assault survivor or domestic violence, including strangulation:
(1)
* * *
(b) If a person under the age of eighteen presents for treatment as a survivor
of sexual assault survivor or domestic violence, including strangulation, the hospital
or healthcare provider shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency or any other official necessary to fulfill any mandatory reporting obligation
required by law.
* * *
(2) All survivors of sexual assault survivors or domestic violence, including
strangulation, shall be examined by a qualified healthcare provider and treated,
without undue delay, in a private space required to ensure the health, safety, and
welfare of the survivor by a qualified healthcare provider. Examination and
treatment, including the forensic medical examination, shall be adapted as necessary
to address the unique needs and circumstances of each survivor. All survivors shall
be afforded an advocate whose communications are privileged in accordance with
the provisions of R.S. 46:2187, if one is available. With the consent of the survivor,
an advocate shall remain in the examination room during the forensic medical
examination. With the consent of the survivor, the examination and treatment of all
sexual assault survivors shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:
* * *
(b) Patient interview, including all of the following:
(i) Any history of violence or abuse.
(ii) Current and prior strangulation history.
(iii) An assessment and documentation of any current and prior symptoms
and injuries.
(iv) Any other relevant medical history, triage, and consultation.
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
(v) Triage.
(vi) Consultation.
(c) Collection and evaluation of evidence, including but not limited to the
following:
(i) Physical evidence.
(i) (ii) Photographic documentation.
(iii) Medical and forensic specimens, including toxicology screening for
alcohol and drug-facilitated sexual assaults or domestic violence.
(ii) (iv) Preservation and maintenance of chain of custody.
(iii) Medical specimen collection.
(iv) When determined necessary by the healthcare provider, an alcohol or
drug-facilitated sexual assault assessment and toxicology screening.
(d) Any testing recommended by the healthcare provider or related to the
sexual assault or recommended by the healthcare provider or domestic violence,
including strangulation.
(e) Any medication provided during the forensic medical examination, which
may include emergency contraception and prophylaxis for HIV or STI prophylaxis
a sexually transmitted infection.
* * *
(5) No hospital or healthcare provider shall directly bill a survivor of a
sexually oriented criminal offense or domestic violence, including strangulation, for
any healthcare services rendered in conducting a forensic medical examination,
including the healthcare services rendered in accordance with Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection and the following:
* * *
(c)(i) Necessary and recommended medical care to ensure that no
life-threatening injuries are present, including diagnostic treatment and procedures
and radiographic studies.
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
(ii) The services described in Item (i) of this Subparagraph are considered
medical treatment and shall not be included in the forensic costs or billing for
medical examination. Any medical expenses incurred by the healthcare provider
may be billed to the insurance provider of the patient, if applicable.
(6) The healthcare provider who performed the forensic medical exam
examination and the hospital or healthcare facility shall submit a claim for payment
for conducting a forensic medical exam examination directly to the Crime Victim
Reparations Board to be paid in strict accordance with the provisions of R.S.
46:1822. A survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense or domestic violence,
including strangulation, shall not be billed directly or indirectly for the performance
of any forensic medical exam examination. The provisions of this Paragraph shall
not be interpreted or construed to do not apply to either of the following:
(a) A healthcare provider billing for any medical services that are not
specifically set forth in this Section or provided for diagnosis or treatment of the
survivor for injuries related to the sexual assault or domestic violence, including
strangulation.
(b) A survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense seeking or domestic
violence, including strangulation, who seeks reparations in accordance with the
Crime Victims Reparations Act, R.S. 46:1801 et seq., for the costs for any medical
services that are not specifically set forth in this Section or provided for the diagnosis
or treatment of the survivor for injuries related to the sexual assault or domestic
violence, including strangulation.
(7) The department Louisiana Department of Health shall make available to
every hospital and healthcare provider licensed under the laws of this state a
pamphlet containing an explanation of the billing process for services rendered
pursuant to this Section. Every hospital and healthcare provider shall provide a copy
of the pamphlet to any person presented for treatment as a survivor of a sexually
oriented criminal offense or domestic violence, including strangulation.
* * *
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
G.(1) Upon request of a competent adult survivor of a sexually oriented
criminal offense or domestic violence, including strangulation, the healthcare
provider that performed the forensic medical exam examination shall provide a
reproduction of any written documentation which that is in the possession of the
healthcare provider resulting from the forensic medical exam examination of the
survivor. The documentation shall be provided to the survivor no later than fourteen
days after the healthcare provider receives the request or the healthcare provider
completes the documentation, whichever is later.
* * *
H. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
* * *
(8) "Domestic violence" means but is not limited to acts that constitute any
of the following:
(a) Battery of a dating partner (R.S. 14:34.9).
(b) Aggravated assault upon a dating partner (R.S. 14:34.9.1).
(c) Domestic abuse battery (R.S. 14:35.3).
(d) Domestic abuse aggravated assault (R.S. 14:37.7).
(e) Dating violence as provided in R.S. 46:2151.
Section 3. R.S. 46:1816(B)(introductory paragraph) and (8) and 1822(A) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1816. Crime Victims Reparations Fund; creation; sources and use of funds
* * *
B. The fund shall be composed of the following:
* * *
(8) Monies deposited by the state treasurer from the collection of unclaimed
prize money as provided for in R.S. 4:176 and R.S. 27:94, 252, 394, and 610, which
shall be used exclusively to pay the expenses associated with healthcare services of
and forensic medical examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622 for victims of sexually
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
oriented criminal offenses or domestic violence, including strangulation, including
forensic medical examinations as defined in R.S. 15:622.
* * *
§1822. Forensic medical exams examinations; reimbursement
A. The board shall reimburse a healthcare provider who performs a forensic
medical exam examinations in the amount of six hundred dollars. The board shall
reimburse the healthcare facility at which where a forensic medical exam
examination was conducted for the cost of performing the exam examination in the
amount of one thousand dollars. The reimbursement amounts shall cover all of the
following:
(1) Forensic examiner and hospital or healthcare facility services directly
related to the examination, including integral forensic supplies.
(2) Scope procedures directly related to the forensic medical examination,
including but not limited to anoscopy and colposcopy.
(3) Laboratory testing directly related to the forensic medical examination,
including drug screening, urinalysis, pregnancy screening, syphilis screening,
chlamydia culture, gonorrhea coverage culture, blood test for HIV screening,
hepatitis B and C, herpes culture, and any other sexually transmitted disease testing
directly related to the forensic medical examination.
(4) Any medication provided during the forensic medical examination.
* * *
Section 4. No later than six months from the effective date of this Act, the Crime
Victim's Reparations Board within the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice shall establish a statewide domestic violence forensic
protocol and implement procedures for processing the reimbursement of forensic medical
examinations pursuant to R.S. 46:1822. The Louisiana Department of Justice, office of the
attorney general, shall work with other state agencies and stakeholders across this state to
develop and approve a standardized statewide forensic medical examination.
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1453 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 998
Section 5. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the Paragraphs of R.S. 15:622(A) and R.S. 40:1216.1(H) so as to
properly place in alphabetical order R.S. 15:622(A)(6) and R.S. 40:1216.1(H)(8) as enacted
by this Act.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.